ja: ベルハウジングのボルトパターン: BMW M5x/M54; クライスラー HEMI; クライスラー LA / Magnum; フォード Modular; フォード スモールブロック (Windsor); GM ビッグブロック; GM スモールブロック / LS; ホンダ Kシリーズ; マツダ BP; メルセデス M1xx; 日産 RB; スバル EJ; トヨタ JZ; その他
th: รูปแบบรูยึดของเรือนเกียร์: BMW M5x/M54; Chrysler HEMI; Chrysler LA / Magnum; Ford Modular; Ford สมอลบล็อก (Windsor); GM บิ๊กบล็อก; GM สมอลบล็อก / LS; Honda K-series; Mazda BP; Mercedes M1xx; Nissan RB; Subaru EJ; Toyota JZ; อื่นๆ
el: Μοτίβο βιδών καμπύλης συμπλέκτη: BMW M5x/M54; Chrysler HEMI; Chrysler LA / Magnum; Ford Modular; Ford small-block (Windsor); GM big-block; GM small-block / LS; Honda K-series; Mazda BP; Mercedes M1xx; Nissan RB; Subaru EJ; Toyota JZ; Άλλο
pl: Wzór śrub bellhousingu: BMW M5x/M54; Chrysler HEMI; Chrysler LA / Magnum; Ford Modular; Ford small-block (Windsor); GM big-block; GM small-block / LS; Honda K-series; Mazda BP; Mercedes M1xx; Nissan RB; Subaru EJ; Toyota JZ; Inne
fi: Kellokotelon kuvio: BMW M5x/M54; Chrysler HEMI; Chrysler LA / Magnum; Ford Modular; Ford pikkulohko (Windsor); GM isolohko; GM pikkulohko / LS; Honda K-sarja; Mazda BP; Mercedes M1xx; Nissan RB; Subaru EJ; Toyota JZ; Muu
zh-TW: 離合器罩螺栓孔位: BMW M5x/M54; Chrysler HEMI; Chrysler LA / Magnum; Ford Modular; Ford 小缸體 (Windsor); GM 大缸體; GM 小缸體 / LS; Honda K 系列; Mazda BP; Mercedes M1xx; Nissan RB; Subaru EJ; Toyota JZ; 其他
cs: Rozložení šroubů zvonového krytu: BMW M5x/M54; Chrysler HEMI; Chrysler LA / Magnum; Ford Modular; Ford small-block (Windsor); GM big-block; GM small-block / LS; Honda K-series; Mazda BP; Mercedes M1xx; Nissan RB; Subaru EJ; Toyota JZ; Jiné
it: Schema di foratura della campana della frizione: BMW M5x/M54; Chrysler HEMI; Chrysler LA / Magnum; Ford Modular; Ford small-block (Windsor); GM big-block; GM small-block / LS; Honda serie K; Mazda BP; Mercedes M1xx; Nissan RB; Subaru EJ; Toyota JZ; Altro
vi: Kiểu bắt vít vỏ chuông: BMW M5x/M54; Chrysler HEMI; Chrysler LA / Magnum; Ford Modular; Ford khối nhỏ (Windsor); GM khối lớn; GM khối nhỏ / LS; Honda K-series; Mazda BP; Mercedes M1xx; Nissan RB; Subaru EJ; Toyota JZ; Khác
nb: Boltmønster for klokkehus: BMW M5x/M54; Chrysler HEMI; Chrysler LA / Magnum; Ford Modular; Ford small-block (Windsor); GM big-block; GM small-block / LS; Honda K-serie; Mazda BP; Mercedes M1xx; Nissan RB; Subaru EJ; Toyota JZ; Annet
sk-SK: Schéma skrutiek puzdra zvončeka: BMW M5x/M54; Chrysler HEMI; Chrysler LA/Magnum; Ford Modular; Ford small-block (Windsor); GM big-block; GM small-block / LS; Honda radu K; Mazda BP; Mercedes M1xx; Nissan RB; Subaru EJ; Toyota JZ; Iné
ru: Расположение болтов картера раструба: BMW M5x/M54; Chrysler HEMI; Chrysler LA / Magnum; Ford Modular; Ford small-block (Windsor); GM big-block; GM small-block / LS; Honda K-series; Mazda BP; Mercedes M1xx; Nissan RB; Subaru EJ; Toyota JZ; Другое
ko: 벨 하우징 볼트 패턴: BMW M5x/M54; 크라이슬러 HEMI; 크라이슬러 LA/매그넘; 포드 모듈러; 포드 스몰 블록(윈저); GM 빅 블록; GM 스몰 블록/LS; 혼다 K 시리즈; 마쓰다 BP; 메르세데스 M1xx; 닛산 RB; 스바루 EJ; 토요타 JZ; 기타
nl: Koppelingshuis boutpatroon: BMW M5x/M54; Chrysler HEMI; Chrysler LA / Magnum; Ford Modular; Ford small-block (Windsor); GM big-block; GM small-block / LS; Honda K-series; Mazda BP; Mercedes M1xx; Nissan RB; Subaru EJ; Toyota JZ; Overige
lt-LT: Varpo korpuso varžtų išdėstymas: BMW M5x / M54; Chrysler HEMI; Chrysler LA / Magnum; Ford Modular; Ford small-block (Windsor); GM big-block; GM small-block / LS; Honda K-series; Mazda BP; Mercedes M1xx; Nissan RB; Subaru EJ; Toyota JZ; Kita
es: Patrón de pernos de la campana de transmisión: BMW M5x/M54; Chrysler HEMI; Chrysler LA/Magnum; Ford modular; Bloque pequeño de Ford (Windsor); Bloque grande de GM; Bloque pequeño de GM / LS; Serie K de Honda; Mazda BP; Mercedes M1xx; Nissan RB; Subaru EJ; Toyota JZ; Otro
fr: Configuration des points de fixation du carter de cloche: BMW M5x/M54; Chrysler HEMI; Chrysler LA / Magnum; Ford Modular; Petit bloc Ford (Windsor); Gros bloc GM; Petit bloc GM / LS; Honda K-series; Mazda BP; Mercedes M1xx; Nissan RB; Subaru EJ; Toyota JZ; Autre
da: Boltmønster til koblingshus: BMW M5x/M54; Chrysler HEMI; Chrysler LA / Magnum; Ford Modular; Ford small-block (Windsor); GM big-block; GM small-block / LS; Honda K-serie; Mazda BP; Mercedes M1xx; Nissan RB; Subaru EJ; Toyota JZ; Andet
de: Schraubenmuster des Glockengehäuses: BMW M5x/M54; Chrysler HEMI; Chrysler LA/Magnum; Ford Modular; Ford Small-Block (Windsor); GM Big-Block; GM Small-Block/LS; Honda K-Serie; Mazda BP; Mercedes M1xx; Nissan RB; Subaru EJ; Toyota JZ; Sonstige
en: Bellhousing bolt pattern: BMW M5x/M54; Chrysler HEMI; Chrysler LA / Magnum; Ford Modular; Ford small-block (Windsor); GM big-block; GM small-block / LS; Honda K-series; Mazda BP; Mercedes M1xx; Nissan RB; Subaru EJ; Toyota JZ; Other
sl-SI: Vzorec vijakov ohišja sklopke: BMW M5x/M54; Chrysler HEMI; Chrysler LA / Magnum; Ford Modular; Fordov mali blok (Windsor); GM veliki blok; GM mali blok / LS; Honda K-serija; Mazda BP; Mercedes M1xx; Nissan RB; Subaru EJ; Toyota JZ; Drugo
pt-PT: Padrão de parafusos da carcaça da embraiagem: BMW M5x/M54; Chrysler HEMI; Chrysler LA / Magnum; Ford Modular; Ford small-block (Windsor); GM big-block; GM small-block / LS; Honda K-series; Mazda BP; Mercedes M1xx; Nissan RB; Subaru EJ; Toyota JZ; Outro
pt-BR: Padrão de parafusos da carcaça da embreagem: BMW M5x/M54; Chrysler HEMI; Chrysler LA/Magnum; Ford Modular; Ford small-block (Windsor); GM big-block; GM small-block/LS; Honda K-series; Mazda BP; Mercedes M1xx; Nissan RB; Subaru EJ; Toyota JZ; Outros
hu: Harangház csavarozási mintázata: BMW M5x/M54; Chrysler HEMI; Chrysler LA / Magnum; Ford Modular; Ford small-block (Windsor); GM big-block; GM small-block / LS; Honda K-series; Mazda BP; Mercedes M1xx; Nissan RB; Subaru EJ; Toyota JZ; Egyéb
tr: Debriyaj muhafazası cıvata deseni: BMW M5x/M54; Chrysler HEMI; Chrysler LA / Magnum; Ford Modüler; Ford küçük blok (Windsor); GM büyük blok; GM küçük blok / LS; Honda K serisi; Mazda BP; Mercedes M1xx; Nissan RB; Subaru EJ; Toyota JZ; Diğer
zh-CN: 钟罩螺栓孔分布样式: BMW M5x/M54; Chrysler HEMI; Chrysler LA/Magnum; Ford Modular; Ford 小缸体 (Windsor); GM 大缸体; GM 小缸体/LS; Honda K 系列; Mazda BP; Mercedes M1xx; Nissan RB; Subaru EJ; Toyota JZ; 其他
hr-HR: Uzorak vijčanih rupa zvona mjenjača: BMW M5x/M54; Chrysler HEMI; Chrysler LA / Magnum; Ford Modular; Ford small-block (Windsor); GM big-block; GM small-block / LS; Honda K-series; Mazda BP; Mercedes M1xx; Nissan RB; Subaru EJ; Toyota JZ; Ostalo
sv: Bultmönster för klockhus: BMW M5x/M54; Chrysler HEMI; Chrysler LA/Magnum; Ford Modular; Ford small-block (Windsor); GM big-block; GM small-block/LS; Honda K-serien; Mazda BP; Mercedes M1xx; Nissan RB; Subaru EJ; Toyota JZ; Övrigt
bg-BG: Схема на разположение на болтовете на камбанния корпус (между двигателя и трансмисията).: BMW M5x/M54; Chrysler HEMI; Chrysler LA/Magnum; Ford Modular; Ford малък блок (Windsor); GM голям блок; GM малък блок / LS; Honda K-серия; Mazda BP; Mercedes M1xx; Nissan RB; Subaru EJ; Toyota JZ; Друго
ro-RO: Modelul șuruburilor carcasei clopotului: BMW M5x/M54; Chrysler HEMI; Chrysler LA / Magnum; Ford Modular; Ford small-block (Windsor); GM big-block; GM small-block / LS; Honda seria K; Mazda BP; Mercedes M1xx; Nissan RB; Subaru EJ; Toyota JZ; Altele